West Virginia, session 2026, HB4331.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Division of Natural Resources. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §20-1-7 of this code, relating to the Division of Natural Resources (prohibitions when hunting and trapping, 58 CSR 47), is authorized.